Georgia statutes. TITLE 31 Health
Cross references.

COVID-19 Pandemic Business Safety, see T. 51, C. 16.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Aftermath of Baby Doe and the Evolution of Newborn Intensive Care,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 835 (2009).

For article, “The Problem of Non-Identity in Valuing Newborn Human Life,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 865 (2009).

For article, “Baby Doe:
Does It Really Apply Now? Palliative Care of the Ill Neonate,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 901 (2009).

For article, “Why the Capta’s Baby Doe Rules Should Be Rejected in Favor of the Best Interests Standard,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 909 (2009).

For article, “Personal Reflections on Extremely Premature Newborns: Vitalism, Treatment Decisions, and Ethical Permissibility,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 931 (2009).

For article, “Medical Futility,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 985 (2009).

For article, “The Baby Doe Regulations and Tragic Choices at the Bedside: Accepting the Limits of ‘Good Process’,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1019 (2009).

For article, “Rescuing Baby Doe,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1043 (2009).

For article, “Playing God with Baby Doe:
Quality of Life and Unpredictable Life Standards at the Start of Life,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1061 (2009).

For article, “Baby Doe and Beyond: Examining the Practical and Philosophical Influences Impacting Medical Decision-Making on Behalf of Marginally-Viable Newborns,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1097 (2009).

For note, “Baby Doe at Twenty-Five,” see 25 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 801 (2009).

For note, “Phase Six Pandemic:
A Call to Re-Evaluate Federal Quarantine Authority Before the Next Catastrophic
Outbreak,” see 44 Ga. L. Rev. 803 (2010).

For comment, “How Will I Know? An Auditing Privilege and Health Care Compliance,” see 65 Emory L.J. 1139 (2016).

For article, “What Is (And Isn’t) Healthism,” see 50 Ga. L. Rev. 833 (2016).

For article, “Tackling the Social Determinants of Health:
A Central for Providers,” see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 217 (2017).

For article, “Medical-Legal Collaboration and Community Partnerships:
Prioritizing Prevention of Human Trafficking in Federally Qualified Health Centers,” see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1075 (2020).